scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VII_n.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     agawaatebiigisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agawaatebiigisin
     agawaatebiigisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agawaatebiigising
     agawaatebiigisin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egawaatebiigising
     agawaatesin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agawaatesin
     agawaatesin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agawaatesing
     agawaatesin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egawaatesing
     agaasin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasin
     agaasin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agaasing
     agaasin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egaasing
     agogin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agogin
     agogin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agoging
     agogin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egoging
     agwanaatesin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwanaatesin
     agwanaatesin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwanaatesing
     agwanaatesin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwanaatesing
     agwaagosin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaagosin 
     agwaagosin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaagosing
     agwaagosin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwaagosing
     agwaagwaabikisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaagwaabikisin
     agwaagwaabikisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaagwaabikising
     agwaagwaabikisin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwaagwaabikising
     agwaakwadin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaakwadin
     agwaakwadin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaakwading
     agwaakwadin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwaakwading
     agwaayaa'an+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaayaa'an
     agwaayaa'an+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaayaa'ang
     agwaayaa'an+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwaayaa'ang
     agwaayaasin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaayaasin 
     agwaayaasin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: agwaayaasing
     agwaayaasin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: egwaayaasing
     akiiwan+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akiiwan 
     akiiwan+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: akiiwang
     akiiwan+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ekiiwang
     anibesin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anibesin
     anibesin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anibesing
     anibesin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enibesing
     animaa'an+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animaa'an 
     animaa'an+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animaa'ang
     animaa'an+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimaa'ang
     animaasin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animaasin 
     animaasin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animaasing
     animaasin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimaasing
     animibiisaan+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animibiisaan
     animibiisaan+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animibiisaang
     animijiwan+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animijiwan
     animijiwan+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animijiwang
     animijiwan+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimijiwang
     animikosin+VII+Imp+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animikosin
     animikosin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animikosing
     animikosin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimikosing
     animwewebiisaan+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animwewebiisaan
     animwewebiisaan+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: animwewebiisaang
     animwewebiisaan+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enimwewebiisaang
     anishinaabewisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anishinaabewisin
     anishinaabewisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anishinaabewising
     anishinaabewisin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enishinaabewising
     anwaatin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: anwaating
     anwaatin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: enwaating
     apagada'an+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apagada'an
     apagada'an+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apagada'ang
     apagadaasin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apagadaasin
     apagadaasin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apagadaasing
     apagadaasin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epagadaasing
     apangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apangisin 
     apangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apangising
     apangisin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epangising
     apisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apisin
     apisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apising
     apisin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epising
     apiichigin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiichigin
     apiichigin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiichiging
     apiichigin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiichiging
     apiichisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apiichisin
     apiichisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiichising
     apiichisin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiichising
     apiitadin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitadin
     apiitadin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitading
     apiitadin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitading
     apiita'an+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiita'an
     apiita'an+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiita'ang
     apiita'an+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiita'ang
     apiitakamigadin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitakamigadin
     apiitakamigadin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitakamigading
     apiitakamigadin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitakamigading
     apiitan+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitan
     apiitan+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitang
     apiitan+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitang
     apiitaakwadin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaakwadin
     apiitaakwadin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: apiitaakwading
     apiitaakwadin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: epiitaakwading
     asiniiwan+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asiniiwan 
     asiniiwan+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: asiniiwang
     asiniiwan+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: esiniiwang
     ashidaakosin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashidaakosin
     ashidaakosin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashidaakosing
     ashidaakosin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eshidaakosing
     ashkaatigowan+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkaatigowan
     ashkaatigowan+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkaatigowang
     ashkaatigowan+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eshkaatigowang
     ashkin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashkin 
     ashkin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ashking
     ashkin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: eshking
     awan+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: awan 
     awan+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: awang
     awan+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ewang
     azhashkiiwan+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhashkiiwan
     azhashkiiwan+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhashkiiwang
     azhashkiiwan+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ezhashkiiwang
     azhawaasin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhawaasin
     azhawaasin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhawaasing
     azhawaasin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ezhawaasing
     azheyaasin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azheyaasin
     azheyaasin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azheyaasing
     azheyaasin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ezheyaasing
     azhiwaasin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhiwaasin
     azhiwaasin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: azhiwaasing
     azhiwaasin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ezhiwaasing
     aabijijiwan+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabijijiwan
     aabijijiwan+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabijijiwang
     aabijijiwan+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabijijiwang
     aabita-biboon+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabita-biboon
     aabita-biboon+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabita-biboong
     aabita-biboon+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabita-biboong
     aabita-niibin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabita-niibin
     aabita-niibin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aabita-niibing
     aabita-niibin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaabita-niiibing
     aanakwadowan+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanakwadowan
     aanakwadowan+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanakwadowang
     aanikoosin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanikoosin
     aanikoosin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanikoosing
     aanikoosin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaanikoosing
     aanjisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjisin
     aanjisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aanjising
     aasamaatesin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aasamaatesin
     aasamaatesin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aasamaatesing
     aasamisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aasamisin
     aasamisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aasamising
     aaswaakosin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aaswaakosin
     aaswaakosin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aaswaakosing
     aaswaakosin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaaswaakosing
     aataweyaabikisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aataweyaabikisin
     aataweyaabikisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aataweyaabikising
     aataweyaabikisin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaataweyaabikising
     aateyaasin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aateyaasin
     aateyaasin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aateyaasing
     aatwaakosin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aatwaakosin
     aatwaakosin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aatwaakosing
     aatwaakosin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaatwaakosing
     aawan+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aawan
     aawan+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aawang
     aawan+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaawang
     aayenaabiisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aayenaabiisin
     aayenaabiisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aayenaabiising
     aazhawaakosin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aazhawaakosin
     aazhawaakosin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aazhawaakosing
     aazhawaakosin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaazhawaakosing
     aazhawaasin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aazhawaasin
     aazhawaasin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg: aazhawaasing
     aazhawaasin+VII+?+Pos+Neu+0Sg: ayaazhawaasing
